Virginia statutes. Title 6.2. Financial Institutions and Services.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 6.2-600.
Repealed by Acts 2013, cc. 30 and 102.

Editor’s note.

Former §

6.2-600

, requiring that checks on consumer deposit accounts show date account was opened, derived from Acts 1981, c. 214, § 6.1-2.9:2; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-601.
Federal insurance of deposits required for all banks or savings institutions.

Notwithstanding any other provisions contained in this title, no bank or savings institution doing business in the Commonwealth shall accept deposits unless its deposit accounts are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or other federal insurance agency, up to the limits of the insurance provided thereby. No bank or savings institution shall solicit deposits in the Commonwealth, nor shall any other person solicit or accept deposits in the Commonwealth on behalf of a bank or savings institution, unless the deposit accounts of such bank or savings institution are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or other federal insurance agency, up to the limits of the insurance provided thereby.

History.

1986, c. 500, § 6.1-2.9:4; 1990, c. 3; 1996, c. 16; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-602.
Adverse claims to accounts.

Notice to any financial institution doing business in the Commonwealth of an adverse claim to funds in an account with such institution shall not require the institution to recognize the adverse claim unless the adverse claimant shall either:

Procure a restraining order, injunction, or other appropriate order against the financial institution from an appropriate court; or

Execute to such financial institution, in form and with sureties acceptable to it, a bond indemnifying the institution from any and all liability, loss, damage, costs, and expenses, for and on account of the payment or recognition of such adverse claim, or the dishonor of, or failure to pay, any check, or failure to comply with any other order, of the person to whose credit the account is held.

This section shall not affect the provisions of Article 2 (§

6.2-604

et seq.) of this chapter governing multiple-party accounts, and any claim by a party to such account shall be determined in accordance with the provisions therein.

This section shall not affect any notice of lien pursuant to §

8.01-502

, any order of an appropriate court, or the issuance of a notice or other action issued by a state or federal governmental agency.

History.

1996, c. 963, § 6.1-2.9:7; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-603.
Medical savings accounts and health savings accounts.

To the extent allowed by federal law, a bank, insured savings institution, or credit union may act as a trustee or custodian of health savings accounts established with financial institutions under § 223 of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to time, and medical savings accounts established with financial institutions under § 220 of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to time. Contributions may be accepted and interest thereon retained by such institution pursuant to forms provided by it and may be invested in accounts of the institution in accordance with the terms upon which such contributions were accepted. The financial institution shall administer such accounts in accordance with the requirements of federal law.

History.

1999, c. 331, § 6.1-2.9:8; 2005, cc. 503, 572; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-603.1.
Savings promotions.

“Depository institution”
means a bank, savings institution, or credit union that is subject to any provision of this title and that offers savings accounts, share accounts, certificates of deposit, or other savings products or programs.

“Nonqualifying account”
means a savings account, share account, certificate of deposit, or other savings product or program offered by a depository institution that is not a qualifying account.

“Qualifying account”
means a savings account, share account, share certificate, or other savings product or program offered by a depository institution through which depositors may obtain chances to win prizes in a savings promotion.

“Savings promotion”
means a contest or promotion sponsored by a depository institution in which a chance of winning designated prizes is obtained by its depositors for the purposes of encouraging depositors to build and maintain savings deposits.

B.

Any depository institution may sponsor a savings promotion in accordance with the provisions of this section, to the extent (i) the savings promotion is not prohibited by federal law or regulation and (ii) the savings promotion complies with the following requirements:

Participants in the savings promotion shall not be required to provide any consideration in order to obtain entries to win. For purposes of this subdivision, participants shall not be deemed to have provided consideration due to the requirement that they deposit a specified amount of money for a specified time period in a qualifying account in order to obtain entries to win, provided that:

The interest rate associated with any such qualifying account is not reduced when compared with other comparable nonqualifying accounts offered by any depository institution, to account for the possibility of depositors winning specified prizes; and

The depository institution does not charge a fee for participating in the savings promotion;

All fees charged in connection with a qualifying account shall be comparable with all fees charged in connection with other comparable nonqualifying accounts, if any, offered by the depository institution;

The savings promotion shall be conducted such that each entry in the savings promotion has an equal chance of being drawn;

Participants in the savings promotion shall not be required to be present at a prize drawing in order to win; and

The savings promotion is conducted in a manner that complies with the applicable requirements of Chapter 31 (§ 59.1-415 et seq.) of Title 59.1.

C.

For purposes of Article 1 (§

18.2-325

et seq.) of Chapter 8 of Title 18.2, a savings promotion offered in accordance with this section shall not constitute illegal gambling or otherwise be deemed to entail the promotion of gambling or a lottery.

History.

2015, cc. 12, 154.